Utah statutes.
39-1-50.   Military court -- Concurrent prosecutorial jurisdiction with county or district attorney.

(1)  The county attorney or district attorney as appropriate under Sections 17-18-1 and 17-18-1.7 of the county where an offense under the Utah Code of Military Justice is committed has concurrent jurisdiction with the Utah Military Court to prosecute the accused person at the expense of the county.

(2)  Charges regarding the offense may not be filed in a military court until the appropriate county attorney or district attorney has reviewed and declined to prosecute the offense.



Amended by Chapter 38, 1993 General Session

